North Carolina statutes. Chapter 48. Adoptions.
Article 6. Adoption by a Former Parent.

§ 48-6-100.
Application of Article.

This Article shall apply to the adoption of adoptees by a former parent.

History.

1995, c. 457, s. 2.

§ 48-6-101.
Readoption under other Articles.

A former parent may readopt a minor adoptee pursuant to Article 3 of this Chapter or, if applicable, Article 4 of this Chapter. A former parent may readopt an adult adoptee pursuant to Article 5 of this Chapter.

History.

1995, c. 457, s. 2.

§ 48-6-102.
Readoption after a stepparent adoption.

In addition to the methods set out in

G.S. 48-6-101

, a former parent may petition pursuant to this section to readopt an adoptee adopted by a stepparent.

The petitioner’s spouse shall not join the petition.

Consent to the readoption must be executed by:

The adoptee, if 12 or more years of age;

The petitioner’s spouse, if any;

The adoptee’s adoptive parent, if the adoptee is a minor;

The adoptee’s parent who is or was the spouse of the adoptive parent, if the adoptee is a minor; and

Any guardian of the adoptee.

The consent executed by the adoptee shall conform to the requirements of

G.S. 48-4-103(e)

.

The consent executed by the petitioner’s spouse shall conform to the requirements of G.S. 48-5-102(c).

The consent executed by the adoptive parent shall conform to the requirements of

G.S. 48-4-103(b)

.

The consent of the adoptee’s parent who was the spouse of the adoptive parent shall conform to the requirements of G.S. 48- 4-103(a) except for those required by G.S. 48-4-103(a)(2)b.

A consent executed by the guardian of a minor adoptee shall conform to the requirements of

G.S. 48-4-103(c)

.

An adoption under this section does not affect the relationship between the adoptee and the parent who was married to the adoptive parent.

An adoption under this section does not terminate or otherwise affect any existing order of custody.

History.

1949, c. 300; 1983, c. 454, s. 6; 1995, c. 457, s. 2.